FULLXIP/parSem/xip/archive/simple.3/esperanto/GRAMMARS/ENGLISH/FST/GM/src/lex-GM.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# CONTENT:	 Special lesxion for GM
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:	 ENGLISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:	 E. Lopez-Garcia, A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	 11-Apr-2006
!# ============================================================================
!# USAGE:	 xfst  -e "read lexc [ThisFile]" -l rules.xfst
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols
+DocType	! document type
+VhclMake	! vehicle make
+VhclModel	! vehicle model
+VhclType	! vehicle type

+Abbr		! abbreviation
 

Definitions
DIGIT = %0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ;
UPPER = A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z;
LOWER = a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z;
LETTER = UPPER | LOWER ;

! ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! DOCUMENT TYPES

LEXICON ROOT
!# overwrite analysis of colon
< %:  %+Punct:0 %+Spec:0 >		# ;

!# special entries:

authorization+DocType			NOUN;
accident% investigation+DocType		NOUN;
agreement+DocType			NOUN;
build+DocType				NOUN;
bulletin+DocType			NOUN;
business% plan+DocType			NOUN;
change% report% request+DocType		NOUN;
chart+DocType				NOUN;
communication+DocType			NOUN;
compliance+DocType			NOUN;
decision% notice% record+DocType		NOUN;
design+DocType				NOUN;
drawing+DocType				NOUN;
engineering+DocType			NOUN;
engineering% log% book+DocType		NOUN;
evaluation% test+DocType			NOUN;
failure% mode% and% effects% analysis+DocType	NOUN;
financial+DocType			NOUN;
folder% tab+DocType			NOUN;
form+DocType				NOUN;
history+DocType				NOUN;
insurance+DocType			NOUN;
invoice+DocType				NOUN;
Issue% problemreport+DocType		NOUN;
legal+DocType				NOUN;
log+DocType				NOUN;
manual+DocType				NOUN;	
meetings+DocType			NOUN;
news% article+DocType			NOUN;
nhtsa% ir+DocType			NOUN;
notes+DocType				NOUN;
other% media+DocType			NOUN;
part+DocType				NOUN;
patent+DocType				NOUN;
ppect% ir+DocType			NOUN;
procedure+DocType			NOUN;
product% assembly% document+DocType	NOUN;
program% productplan+DocType		NOUN;
publication+DocType			NOUN;
quality+DocType				NOUN;
record+DocType				NOUN;
regulation+DocType			NOUN;
report+DocType				NOUN;
requirements% specifications+DocType	NOUN;
resume+DocType				NOUN;
standard+DocType			NOUN;
transcript+DocType			NOUN;
usg+DocType				NOUN;
vehicle% description% summary+DocType	NOUN;
work% order+DocType			NOUN;


! ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! VEHICLE MAKES

Buick+VhclMake				PROP;
Cadillac+VhclMake			PROP;
Cami+VhclMake				PROP;
Chevrolet+VhclMake			PROP;
Daewoo+VhclMake				PROP;
Fiat+VhclMake				PROP;
Geo+VhclMake				PROP;
GM% of% Canada+VhclMake			PROP;
GMC+VhclMake				PROP;
Holden+VhclMake				PROP;
Hummer+VhclMake				PROP;
Isuzu+VhclMake				PROP;
Non% Brand% Specific+VhclMake		PROP;
Nummi+VhclMake				PROP;
Oldsmobile+VhclMake			PROP;
Opel+VhclMake				PROP;
Other+VhclMake				PROP;
Pontiac+VhclMake			PROP;
Saab+VhclMake				PROP;
Saturn+VhclMake				PROP;
Toyota+VhclMake				PROP;
Vauxhall+VhclMake			PROP;

! ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! VEHICLE MODELS

!! buick
Apollo+VhclModel		PROP;
Centurion+VhclModel		PROP;
Century+VhclModel		PROP;
Coachbuilder+VhclModel		PROP;
Electra+VhclModel		PROP;
Electra% Park% Avenue+VhclModel		PROP;
Estate+VhclModel		PROP;
Lesabre+VhclModel		PROP;
Park% Avenue+VhclModel		PROP;
Ranier+VhclModel		PROP;
Reatta+VhclModel		PROP;
Regal+VhclModel		PROP;
Rendezvous+VhclModel		PROP;
Riviera+VhclModel		PROP;
Roadmaster+VhclModel		PROP;
Skyhawk+VhclModel		PROP;
Skylark+VhclModel		PROP;
Somerset+VhclModel		PROP;
Special% Deluxe+VhclModel		PROP;
Wildcat+VhclModel		PROP;


!! cadillac
Allante+VhclModel		PROP;
Brougham+VhclModel		PROP;
Catera+VhclModel		PROP;
Cimarron+VhclModel		PROP;
Cimarron% Seville+VhclModel		PROP;
Concours+VhclModel		PROP;
Deville+VhclModel		PROP;
Eldorado+VhclModel		PROP;
Escalade+VhclModel		PROP;
Escalade% Ext+VhclModel		PROP;
Fleetwood+VhclModel		PROP;
Seville+VhclModel		PROP;
STS+VhclModel		PROP;
SSS+VhclModel		PROP;
XLR+VhclModel		PROP;


!! chevrolet
Astro+VhclModel		PROP;
Astroavalanche+VhclModel		PROP;
Avalanchebelair+VhclModel		PROP;
Belairberetta+VhclModel		PROP;
Berettaberlinetta+VhclModel		PROP;
Berlinetta+VhclModel		PROP;
Biscayne+VhclModel		PROP;
Blazer+VhclModel		PROP;
Brookwood+VhclModel		PROP;
Cadette+VhclModel		PROP;
Camaro+VhclModel		PROP;
Caprice+VhclModel		PROP;
Cavalier+VhclModel		PROP;
Celebrity+VhclModel		PROP;
Celta+VhclModel		PROP;
Chevelle% Nomad+VhclModel		PROP;
Chevette+VhclModel		PROP;
Chevy% II+VhclModel		PROP;
Citation+VhclModel		PROP;
Colorado+VhclModel		PROP;
Conora% ST+VhclModel		PROP;
Corsica+VhclModel		PROP;
Corvair+VhclModel		PROP;
Corvette+VhclModel		PROP;
El% Camino+VhclModel		PROP;
Eurosport+VhclModel		PROP;
Express+VhclModel		PROP;
Greenbrier+VhclModel		PROP;
Impala+VhclModel		PROP;
Kammback+VhclModel		PROP;
Kingswood+VhclModel		PROP;
Laguna+VhclModel		PROP;
Landau+VhclModel		PROP;
Lumina+VhclModel		PROP;
Malibu+VhclModel		PROP;
Monte% Carlo+VhclModel		PROP;
Monza+VhclModel		PROP;
Nova+VhclModel		PROP;
Prism+VhclModel		PROP;
S-10+VhclModel		PROP;
S10% SSR+VhclModel		PROP;
Silverado+VhclModel		PROP;
Spectrum+VhclModel		PROP;
Suburban+VhclModel		PROP;
Tahoe+VhclModel		PROP;
Townsmen+VhclModel		PROP;
Tracer+VhclModel		PROP;
Trailblazer+VhclModel		PROP;
Vega+VhclModel		PROP;
Venture+VhclModel		PROP;
Z-28+VhclModel		PROP;


!! geo
Metro+VhclModel		PROP;
Prizm+VhclModel		PROP;
Sprint+VhclModel		PROP;
Storm+VhclModel		PROP;
Tracker+VhclModel		PROP;


!! gm of canada
Acadian+VhclModel		PROP;
Impulse+VhclModel		PROP;
Optima+VhclModel		PROP;
Stylus+VhclModel		PROP;
Sunburst+VhclModel		PROP;


!! gmc
Canyon+VhclModel		PROP;
Denali+VhclModel		PROP;
Envoy+VhclModel		PROP;
Jimmy+VhclModel		PROP;
Safari+VhclModel		PROP;
Savana+VhclModel		PROP;
Sierra+VhclModel		PROP;
Sonom+VhclModel		PROP;
Suburban+VhclModel		PROP;
Vandura+VhclModel		PROP;
Yukon+VhclModel		PROP;


!! hummer
H1+VhclModel		PROP;
H2+VhclModel		PROP;
H3+VhclModel		PROP;


!! isuzu
Ascender+VhclModel		PROP;
Hombre+VhclModel		PROP;
Rodeo+VhclModel		PROP;
Trooper+VhclModel		PROP;


!! oldsmobile
88+VhclModel		PROP;
98+VhclModel		PROP;
442+VhclModel		PROP;
88% Royale+VhclModel		PROP;
98% Brougham+VhclModel		PROP;
98% Regency+VhclModel		PROP;
Achieva+VhclModel		PROP;
Alero+VhclModel		PROP;
Aurora+VhclModel		PROP;
Bravada+VhclModel		PROP;
Calais+VhclModel		PROP;
Ciera+VhclModel		PROP;
Custom% Cruiser+VhclModel		PROP;
Cutlass+VhclModel		PROP;
Cutlass% Ciera+VhclModel		PROP;
Delta% 88+VhclModel		PROP;
Eighty-Eight+VhclModel		PROP;
F-85+VhclModel		PROP;
Firenza+VhclModel		PROP;
Intrigue+VhclModel		PROP;
LSS+VhclModel		PROP;
Ninety-Eight+VhclModel		PROP;
Omega+VhclModel		PROP;
Regency+VhclModel		PROP;
Royale+VhclModel		PROP;
Silhouette+VhclModel		PROP;
Starfire+VhclModel		PROP;
Toronado+VhclModel		PROP;
Touring% Sedan+VhclModel		PROP;
Trofeo+VhclModel		PROP;
Vista% Cruiser+VhclModel		PROP;


!! opel
Corsa+VhclModel		PROP;
GT+VhclModel		PROP;
Kadett+VhclModel		PROP;
Monocab+VhclModel		PROP;
Monza+VhclModel		PROP;
Senator+VhclModel		PROP;
Sintra+VhclModel		PROP;
Skipton+VhclModel		PROP;
Speedster+VhclModel		PROP;
Vectra+VhclModel		PROP;
Ventra+VhclModel		PROP;
Zafira+VhclModel		PROP;


!! pontiac
!!6000+VhclModel		PROP;
Astre+VhclModel		PROP;
Astek+VhclModel		PROP;
Bonneville+VhclModel		PROP;
Catalina+VhclModel		PROP;
Esprit+VhclModel		PROP;
Fiero+VhclModel		PROP;
Firebird+VhclModel		PROP;
Firefly+VhclModel		PROP;
Formula+VhclModel		PROP;
Formula% 400+VhclModel		PROP;
Grand% am+VhclModel		PROP;
Grand% lemans+VhclModel		PROP;
Grand% prix+VhclModel		PROP;
Grandville+VhclModel		PROP;
GTO+VhclModel		PROP;
J-2000+VhclModel		PROP;
Lemans+VhclModel		PROP;
Montana+VhclModel		PROP;
Oto+VhclModel		PROP;
Parisienne+VhclModel		PROP;
Phoenix+VhclModel		PROP;
Safari% wagon+VhclModel		PROP;
Sunbird+VhclModel		PROP;
Sunfire+VhclModel		PROP;
T-1000+VhclModel		PROP;
Tempest+VhclModel		PROP;
Trans% am+VhclModel		PROP;
Trans% sport+VhclModel		PROP;
Ventura+VhclModel		PROP;


!! saab
!!900+VhclModel		PROP;
!!9000+VhclModel		PROP;
!!9-3+VhclModel		PROP;
!!9-5+VhclModel		PROP;


!! saturn
Base% Sedan%+VhclModel				PROP;
Base% Sedan%:SL+VhclModel+Abbr			PROP;
ion+VhclModel					PROP;
level% 1% sedan%+VhclModel			PROP;
level% 1% sedan%+VhclModel+Abbr:SL1		PROP;
level% 2% sedan%+VhclModel			PROP;
level% 2% sedan%+VhclModel+Abbr:SL2		PROP;
sport% coupe%+VhclModel				PROP;
sport% coupe%:sc+VhclModel+Abbr			PROP;
sport% coupe% 1%+VhclModel			PROP;
sport% coupe% 1%+VhclModel+Abbr:SC1		PROP;
sport% coupe% 2%+VhclModel			PROP;
sport% coupe% 2%+VhclModel+Abbr:SC2		PROP;
station% wagon% level% 1%+VhclModel		PROP;
station% wagon% level% 1%+VhclModel+Abbr:SW1	PROP;
station% wagon% level% 2%+VhclModel		PROP;
station% wagon% level% 2%+VhclModel+Abbr:SW2	PROP;


!! suzuki
Samurai+VhclModel		PROP;
Sidekick+VhclModel		PROP;

!! vauxhall
Astra+VhclModel		PROP;
Corsa+VhclModel		PROP;
Frontera+VhclModel		PROP;
Omega+VhclModel		PROP;
Tigra+VhclModel		PROP;
Vectra+VhclModel		PROP;
Zafira+VhclModel		PROP; 

! ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! TYPES

< G M [X|T] %  DIGIT DIGIT DIGIT (LETTER) %+VhclType:0 >	#;


! ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! CONTINUATION CLASSES:
! ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON GENSG		< %^GenSg >		#;
LEXICON GENPL		< %^GenPl >		#;

LEXICON optGENSG	#; GENSG;
LEXICON optGENPL	#; GENPL;

LEXICON N/SG		< %+Sg:0 >		optGENSG;
LEXICON N/PL		< %+Pl:0 >		optGENPL;
LEXICON N/SG+PLs				N/SG; 
			< 0:{+s} >		N/PL;

LEXICON PROP/SG		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG;
LEXICON PROP/PL		< %+Prop:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON PROP		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!#  name modifiers
LEXICON PREMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PreMod:0 >		#;
LEXICON POSTMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PostMod:0 >	#;

LEXICON HEAD/SG		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG;
LEXICON HEAD/PL		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON HEAD		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

!# --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# demonyms

LEXICON NOUN		< %+Noun:0 >			N/SG+PLs;
LEXICON NOUNINV		< %+Noun:0 %+SP:0 >		optGENSG;

LEXICON ADJ		< %+Adj:0 >			#;

! noun or adjective
LEXICON NADJ		< %+NAdj:0 %+Sg:0 >		#;
			< %+Noun:0 %+Sg:0 >		GENSG;
			< %+Noun:0 %+Pl:{+s} >		optGENPL;
LEXICON NADJINV		< %+NAdj:0 %+SP:0 >		#;
			< %+Noun:0 %+SP:0 >		GENSG;

! possible replacement:
! LEXICON NADJ		ADJ; NOUN;
! LEXICON NADJINV	ADJ; NOUNINV;
